Mississippi, session 2026, HB1047.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 63-3-519, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 63-3-519.  It * * *shall be is unlawful for any person or peace officer or law enforcement agency, except the Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol, to purchase or use or allow to be used any type of radar speed detection equipment upon any public street, road or highway of this state. However, such equipment may be used: (a)  By municipal law enforcement officers within a municipality having a population of two thousand (2,000) or more according to the latest or a previous federal census upon the public streets of the municipality, but in no case where the latest federal census population for the municipality is less than one thousand five hundred (1,500); (b)  By any college or university campus police force within the confines of any campus wherein more than two thousand (2,000) students are enrolled; (c)  By municipal law enforcement officers in any municipality having a population in excess of fifteen thousand (15,000) according to the latest federal census on federally designated highways lying within the corporate limits. (d) By municipal law enforcement officers upon the public streets of any incorporated municipality (i) where the county seat is located in the municipality and (ii) where there is a public community college located in the municipality * * *.; (e)  By the sheriff and his deputies on any public road, street or highway outside the corporate limits of a municipality for the sole purpose of enforcing speed limits within the special zones designated in the vicinity of schools created under Section 63-3-515 as long as the special zone is indicated by caution blinking lights. The Mississippi Highway Safety Patrol shall be immediately notified by municipal law enforcement of any road blockages or emergencies occurring on any federally designated limited-access highways lying within the corporate limits. SECTION 2.  Section 63-3-515, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 63-3-515.  (1)  The boards of supervisors of counties and the governing authorities of municipalities are hereby authorized to adopt by order or resolution and to enforce within their respective territorial boundaries the maximum legal rate of speed at which a motor vehicle may be run or operated along any public street, road, highway (except state-maintained highways), or portion thereof in the vicinity of schools and churches, upon levees and causeways and in other special zones which the board or governing authorities may designate.  The rate of speed so established shall be determined upon the basis of an engineering and traffic study.  The order or resolution setting such speed limits may provide that such limits are only effective during specified times of the day, days of the week and months of the year. (2)  Funds from violations of the special zones designated in the vicinity of a school created under subsection (1) of this section shall be used by counties for school safety by funding school resource officers or law enforcement officers assigned to schools or by funding safety training of school faculty and staff. SECTION 3.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.